District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.133

Certain representations prohibited.

Unless licensed to practice engineering under this subchapter, no person shall engage directly or indirectly in the practice of engineering in the District or use the title “engineer”, “registered engineer”, “engineering design”, “professional engineer” or display or use any words or letters, figures, titles, signs, cards, advertisement or any other symbols or devices indicating or tending to indicate that the person is an engineer or is practicing engineering.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.133.